Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.200

Shareholders' list for meeting.

(1) After fixing a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its shareholders on the record date who are entitled to notice of a shareholders' meeting. The list must be arranged by voting group, and within each voting group by class or series of shares, and show the address of and number of shares held by each shareholder. Nothing contained in this section requires the corporation to include on such list the electronic mail address or other electronic contact information of a shareholder.

(2) The shareholders' list must be available for inspection by any shareholder, beginning ten days prior to the meeting and continuing through the meeting either: (a) On a reasonably accessible electronic network, on condition that the information necessary to gain access to the list is provided in or accompanies the notice of the meeting; or (b) at the corporation's principal office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. If the corporation elects to make the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is available only to shareholders or their agents or attorneys. A shareholder, the shareholder's agent, or the shareholder's attorney is entitled to inspect the list, during regular business hours and at the shareholder's expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

(3) The corporation must make the shareholders' list available at the meeting, and any shareholder, the shareholder's agent, or the shareholder's attorney is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment. If the meeting is held solely by means of remote communication in accordance with RCW 23B.07.010(4) or 23B.07.020(6), then the list must be available for inspection by any shareholder, the shareholder's agent, or the shareholder's attorney during the whole time of the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access the list must be provided with the notice of the meeting.

(4) If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder, the shareholder's agent, or the shareholder's attorney to inspect the shareholders' list before or at the meeting, the superior court of the county where a corporation's principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located, on application of the shareholder, may summarily order the inspection at the corporation's expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection is complete.

(5) A shareholder's right to copy the shareholders' list, and a shareholder's right to otherwise inspect and copy the record of shareholders, is governed by RCW 23B.16.020(3).

(6) Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders' list does not affect the validity of corporate action approved at the meeting.

[ 2022 c 42 s 106; 2020 c 57 s 52; 2009 c 189 s 17; 1989 c 165 s 68.]